District of Columbia statutes.
5-762

Retired police officer deployment as public school security personnel.

(a)

(1)

Except for disability annuitants, police officers retired from the Metropolitan Police force shall be eligible for rehire at the discretion of the Superintendent of the D.C. Public Schools as security personnel of the D.C. Public Schools without jeopardy to the retirement benefits of the police officers.

(2)

Service pursuant to this section shall not count as creditable service for the purpose of § 5-704.

(3)

A retired police officer who is rehired under this section shall be paid a salary of no more than that equal to the salary paid a Class 1, Step 1 Officer within the Metropolitan Police Department and shall not be eligible for longevity pay.

(4)

A retired police officer who is rehired pursuant to this section shall be vested with the powers of a Special Police Officer with the Uniform Waivers pursuant to § 5-129.02, not including the authority to carry a firearm.

(b)

All costs associated with the hiring of retired police officers as school security guards shall be absorbed within the D.C. Public Schools budget.

(c)

A retired police officer who is rehired pursuant to this section and is vested with the powers of a Special Police Officer would be subject to the requirements of 6A DCMR, Chapter 11, which governs Special Police.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-136, § 2, 41 DCR 3006
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 48, 41 DCR 5193
1981 Ed., § 4-618.2.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Retired Police Officer Public Schools Security Personnel Deployment Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-5, July 31, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 5629).

Application of Law 10-136: Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-136 provided that the act shall apply as of March 6, 1994.

Board to install metal detectors: Section 4 of D.C. Law 10-5 provided that “to the extent possible, the Board of Education shall install metal detectors in junior and senior high schools in accordance with the Board’s commitment in the fiscal year 1992 budget process.”